fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Accessoires pour imprimantes, copieurs et télécopieurs > Matériel pour imprimante > Filtres pour imprimante: Filtres d’imprimantes à air; Filtres d’imprimantes à fumée; Filtres d’imprimantes à ozone; Filtres pour imprimantes à toner
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Phụ kiện máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax > Vật tư máy in > Bộ lọc máy in: Bộ lọc máy in không dây; Bộ lọc máy in khói; Bộ lọc máy in Ozone; Bộ lọc máy in mực
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de impressora, copiadora e fax > Consumíveis de impressora > Filtros de impressora: Filtros de impressora de ar; Filtros de impressora de vapor; Filtros de impressora de ozono; Filtros de impressora de toner
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > プリンター・コピー機関連用品 > プリンター消耗品 > プリンター用フィルター: エアプリンターフィルター; ヒュームプリンターフィルター; オゾンプリンターフィルター; トナープリンターフィルター
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > Zubehör für Drucker, Kopierer & Faxgeräte > Drucker-Verbrauchsmaterial > Druckerfilter: Drucker-Luftfilter; Drucker-Rauchfilter; Drucker-Ozonfilter; Drucker-Toner-Ffilter
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 打印机、复印机和传真机配件 > 打印机耗材 > 打印机过滤器: 打印机空气过滤器; 打印机烟雾过滤器; 打印机臭氧过滤器; 打印机碳粉过滤器
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์ > ของสิ้นเปลืองสำหรับเครื่องพิมพ์ > ตัวกรองเครื่องพิมพ์: ตัวกรองอากาศจากเครื่องพิมพ์; ตัวกรองควันจากเครื่องพิมพ์; ตัวกรองโอโซนจากเครื่องพิมพ์; ตัวกรองโทนเนอร์จากเครื่องพิมพ์
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxgép-kiegészítők > Nyomtató fogyóeszközök > Nyomtatószűrők: Nyomtató-légszűrők; Nyomtató-füstszűrők; Nyomtató-ózonszűrők; Nyomtató-tonerszűrők
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > Tilbehør til skrivere, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner > Forbruksmateriell til skrivere > Skriverfiltre: Luftskriverfiltre; Dampskriverfiltre; Ozonskriverfiltre; Tonerskriverfiltre
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Dodatki za tiskalnike, kopirne stroje in fakse > Potrošni material za tiskalnike > Filtri za tiskalnike: Zračni filtri za tiskalnike; Filtri za dim za tiskalnike; Ozonski filtri za tiskalnike; Filtri za laserske tiskalnike
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Accesorii pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri > Consumabile pentru imprimante > Filtre pentru imprimante: Filtre aer pentru imprimante; Filtre gaze pentru imprimante; Filtre ozon pentru imprimante; Filtre toner pentru imprimante
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 印表機/影印機/傳真機配件 > 印表機耗材 > 印表機過濾器: 印表機空氣過濾器; 印表機空氣濾清器; 印表機臭氧過濾器; 印表機碳過濾器
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Аксесоари за принтери, копирни машини и факс машини > Консумативи за принтери > Тонер касети: Въздушни филтри за принтери; Филтри за отстраняване на изпарения; Филтри за отстраняване на озонови изпарения; Филтри за тонер принтер
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Akcesoria do kopiarek, drukarek i faksów > Materiały eksploatacyjne do drukarek > Filtry do drukarek: Filtry powietrza do drukarek; Filtry oparów do drukarek; Filtry ozonowe do drukarek; Filtry do drukarek z tonerem
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Accessori per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax > Materiali di consumo stampante > Filtri per stampante: Filtri per stampante ad aria; Filtri per stampanti di fumi; Filtri per stampanti a ozono; Filtri per stampanti toner
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > Tulostinten, kopiokoneiden ja faksien lisätarvikkeet > Tulostintarvikkeet > Tulostinsuodattimet: Tulostimen ilmasuodattimet; Tulostimen höyrysuodattimet; Tulostimen otsonisuodattimet; Tulostimen väriainesuodattimet
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Příslušenství k tiskárnám, kopírkám, skenerům a faxům > Spotřební zboží pro tiskárny > Filtry do tiskáren: Vzduchové filtry pro tiskárny; Filtry výparů pro tiskárny; Ozonové filtry pro tiskárny; Tonerové filtry pro tiskárny
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Príslušenstvo k tlačiarňam, kopírkam a faxom > Spotrebný materiál do tlačiarní > Filtre do tlačiarní: Vzduchové filtre do tlačiarní; Dymové filtre do tlačiarní; Ozónové filtre do tlačiarní; Tonerové filtre do tlačiarní
sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Tillbehör till skrivare, kopiator och fax > Förbrukningsvaror för skrivare > Skrivarfilter: Luftskrivarfilter; Rökskrivarfilter; Ozonskrivarfilter; Tonerskrivarfilter
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų priedai > Spausdintuvų eksploatacinės medžiagos > Spausdintuvų filtrai: Spausdintuvų oro filtrai; Spausdintuvų garų filtrai; Spausdintuvų ozono filtrai; Spausdintuvų tonerio filtrai
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Accessoires voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines > Verbruiksartikelen voor printer > Printerfilters: Printerfilters voor lucht; Printerfilters voor damp; Printerfilters voor ozon; Printerfilters voor toners
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Аксессуары для принтеров, копиров и факсов > Расходные материалы для принтеров > Фильтры для принтеров: Воздушные фильтры для принтеров; Фильтры для удаления паров; Озоновые фильтры для принтеров; Фильтры тонера для принтеров
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Accesorios para máquinas de fax, impresoras y fotocopiadoras > Consumibles para impresoras > Filtros para impresoras: Filtros para impresoras de aire; Filtros para impresoras de humos; Filtros para impresoras de ozono; Filtros para impresoras de tóner
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Αξεσουάρ εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ > Αναλώσιμα εκτυπωτών > Φίλτρα εκτυπωτών: Φίλτρα αέρα εκτυπωτών; Φίλτρα αναθυμιάσεων εκτυπωτών; Φίλτρα όζοντος εκτυπωτών; Φίλτρα τόνερ εκτυπωτών
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > Printer, Copier & Fax Machine Accessories > Printer Consumables > Printer Filters: Air Printer Filters; Fume Printer Filters; Ozone Printer Filters; Toner Printer Filters
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Dodaci za pisače, fotokopirne i faks uređaje > Potrošni materijal za pisače > Filtri za pisače: Filtri za Air Printer pisač; Filtri protiv dima; Filtri protiv ozona; Filtri protiv tonera
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Tilbehør til printer, kopimaskine og fax > Printer – forbrugsstoffer > Printer – filtre: Printer – filtre, luft; Printer – filtre, damp; Printer – filtre, ozon; Printer – filtre, toner
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de máquinas de fax, copiadoras e impressoras > Itens para impressora > Filtros para impressora: Filtros de ar para impressoras; Filtros de fumaça para impressora; Filtros de ozônio para impressora; Filtros para impressoras de toner
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > Yazıcı, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Aksesuarları > Yazıcı Sarf Malzemeleri > Yazıcı Filtreleri: Hava Yazıcı Filtreleri; Duman Yazıcı Filtreleri; Ozon Yazıcı Filtreleri; Toner Yazıcı Filtreleri
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 프린터/복사기/팩스 부대용품 > 프린터 소모품 > 프린터 필터: 프린터 에어 필터; 프린터 흄 필터; 프린터 오존 필터; 프린터 토너 필터